Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4244.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. A public body shall comply with section 3 by not later than July 4, 2025. Sec. 3. If a public body utilizes the term "Gulf of Mexico", it shall modify the use of the term to "Gulf of America". Sec. 5. As used in this act, "public body" means a department, board, commission, office, agency, or other unit of state government.